Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 7 By Possession and Prescription

34-7-1.
Conclusive title by peaceful possession under claim of title.

Where any person or persons, or others from whom he, she, or they derive their title, either by themselves, tenants or lessees, shall have been for the space of ten (10) years in the uninterrupted, quiet, peaceful and actual seisin and possession of any lands, tenements or hereditaments for and during that time, claiming the same as his, her or their proper, sole and rightful estate in fee simple, the actual seisin and possession shall be allowed to give and make a good and rightful title to the person or persons, their heirs and assigns forever; and any plaintiff suing for the recovery of any such lands may rely upon the possession as conclusive title thereto, and this chapter being pleaded in bar to any action that shall be brought for the lands, tenements or hereditaments, and the actual seisin and possession being duly proved, shall be allowed to be good, valid and effectual in law for barring the action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 2; P.L. 1912, ch. 798, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-1

.

34-7-2.
Absentees and persons under disability — Reversioners and remaindermen.

Nothing in this chapter shall be so construed, deemed or taken, as to extend to prejudice the rights and claims of persons under age, persons of unsound mind, or persons imprisoned or beyond the limits of the United States, if they bring their suits within the space of ten (10) years next after the impediment is removed; nor to bar any person or persons having any estate in reversion or remainder, expectant or depending, in any lands, tenements or hereditaments, after the end or determination of the estate for years, life or lives, the person or persons pursuing his or their title by due course of law within ten (10) years after his, her, or their right of action shall accrue.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-2

.

34-7-3.
Easement of light and air denied.

Whoever has erected or may erect any house or other building near the land of another person, with windows overlooking the land, shall not, by mere continuance of the windows, acquire any easement of light or air so as to prevent the erection of any building thereon.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-3

.

34-7-4.
Right of footway denied.

No right of footway, except claimed in connection with a right to pass with carriages, shall be acquired by prescription or adverse use for any length of time.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-4

.

34-7-5.
Utility rights-of-way not acquired by enjoyment.

No enjoyment by any persons, companies or corporations, for any length of time, of the privilege of maintaining telegraph, telephone, electric, or other posts, wires or apparatus in, upon or over any lands or buildings of other persons or corporations, shall thereby confer any right to the continued enjoyment of the easement or raise any presumption of a grant thereof.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-5

.

34-7-6.
Notice of intent to dispute interrupting adverse possession.

Whenever the legal owner of any lands anticipates that any other person or persons may obtain the title to those lands, or any way, easement or privilege therein, by possession under the provisions of this chapter, he or she may give notice in writing to the person claiming or using the lands, way, easement, or privilege, of his or her intention to dispute any right arising from that claim or use; and the notice, served and recorded as hereinafter provided, shall be deemed an interruption of the use and prevent the acquiring of any right thereto by the continuance of the use for any length of time thereafter. The notice, signed by the owner of the lands, his guardian or agent, may be served by any disinterested person, making return under oath, on the party so claiming or using the property, his or her agent or guardian, if within this state, otherwise, on the tenant or occupant, if there be any; and the notice, with the return thereon, shall be recorded within three (3) months thereafter in the records of land evidence in the town in which the land is situated, and a copy of the record, certified by the recording officer to be a true copy of the record of the notice, and the return thereon, shall be evidence of the notice and of the service of the same.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-6

.

34-7-7.
Action by claimant in possession after notice of intent to dispute.

Whenever notice is given to prevent the acquisition of lands or way, privilege or other easement, the notice shall be considered so far a disturbance of the right or claim as to enable the party claiming to bring an action for disturbing the same, in order to try the right; and if the plaintiff in the suit prevails, he or she shall recover full costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-7

.

34-7-8.
Shore rights preserved — Prospective applicability.

Nothing herein contained shall affect any rights of the shore to which the people of this state are now entitled under the charter, the constitution or by the law, or be construed to apply to any preceding action.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 205, § 8; G.L. 1909, ch. 256, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 300, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 438, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

34-7-8

.

34-7-9.
Land preserved for open space, conservation or cemetery purposes.

Any land held or preserved by a nonprofit corporation or nonprofit association for purposes of conservation, open space, or a cemetery is not subject to adverse possession or prescription.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 67, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 277, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 288, § 1.